Wisconsin, session 2025, SB884.
do enact as follows:SB884,11Section 1. 908.08 (3) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB884,2,32908.08 (3) (a) (intro.) That the trial or hearing in which the recording is 3offered will commence recording was made:SB884,24Section 2. 908.08 (3) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB884,2,65908.08 (3) (a) 2. Before the child’s 16th 18th birthday and the interests of 6justice warrant its admission under sub. (4).SB884,37Section 3. 908.08 (4) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB884,2,118908.08 (4) (intro.) In determining whether the interests of justice warrant the 9admission of an audiovisual recording of a statement of a child who is at least 12 10years of age but younger than 16 18 years of age, among the factors which the court 11or hearing examiner may consider are any of the following:SB884,412Section 4. Initial applicability.SB884,2,1413(1) This act first applies to actions commenced on the effective date of this 14subsection.SB884,2,1515